California, session 20252026, AB648.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 81055 is added to the Education Code, to read:81055. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Affordable rent” means an amount consistent with the rent limits established by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee.(2) “Extremely low income faculty or staff” means an employee of the California Community Colleges who satisfies the requirements of Section 50106 of the Health and Safety Code.(3) “Lower income faculty or staff” means an employee of the California Community Colleges who satisfies the requirements of Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(4) “Satellite campus” means an auxiliary classroom or a teaching site not a part of the main campus.(5) “University housing development project” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 21080.58 of the Public Resources Code.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a community college district is not required to comply with the zoning ordinances of a city, county, or city and county for a university housing development project constructed on property owned or leased by a community college district, if the parcel on which the project will be constructed meets either of the following requirements:(1) The parcel is contained either wholly or partially within a one-half mile radius of a main campus, as defined in Section 94849.(2) The parcel is contained either wholly or partially within a one-half mile radius of a satellite campus that existed before July 1, 2025.(c) If the university housing development project includes units for faculty and staff, the community college district shall ensure that a portion of the units are made available at affordable rents to extremely low income faculty and staff and to lower income faculty and staff.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that the construction of a university housing development project on property owned or leased by a community college district is a state priority to address the state’s growing affordable housing shortage and its impact on students, is consistent with the state’s development and funding of a holistic, student-centered, affordability and basic needs infrastructure, furthers the state’s interest in advancing economic development through education and training, is a matter of statewide concern, and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act adding Section 81055 to the Education Code applies to all cities, including charter cities.